sv: Typ av webbing i handsken: Basket; Stängd; Kors; Dubbelt gångjärn; Dubbel stolpe; H-web; Halvmåne; Horisontellt gångjärn; I-web; Modifierad fälla; Modifierad trapets; Ett stycke; Öppen dubbel stolpe; Pro-snörad T; Enkel stolpe; Enkel stolpe, dubbel ribba; T-web; Trapets; Tvådelad stängd; Annan
pt-BR: Estilo de teia de luva: Cesta; Fechada; Cruzada; Dobradiça dupla; Trave dupla; Em H; Meia-lua; Dobradiça horizontal; Em I; Trapézio modificado; Trapézio modificado; Peça única; Trave dupla aberta; T com amarração profissional; Trave simples; Trave simples barra dupla; Em T; Trapézio; Fechada de duas peças; Outro
fi: Hanskan verkko-osan tyyli: Kori; Suljettu; Risti; Kaksoissarana; Kaksoispylväs; H-verkko; Puolikuu; Vaakasuora sarana; I-verkko; Muokattu trap; Muokattu trapeze; Yksiosainen; Avoin kaksoispylväs; Pro-Laced T; Yksittäispylväs; Yksittäispylväs ja kaksoistanko; T-verkko; Trapeze; Kaksiosainen suljettu; Muu
lt-LT: Pirštinių pynės stilius: Krepšelis; Uždaras; Kryžminis; Dvigubas lankstas; Dvigubas stulpelis; H raidės formos; Pusmėnulis; Horizontalus lankstas; I raidės formos; Modifikuota gaudyklė; Modifikuota trapecija; Vienos dalies; Atviras dvigubas stulpelis; Profesionalus T formos raištis; Vienas stulpelis; Vienas stulpelis, dviguba juosta; T raidės formos; Trapecija; Dviejų dalių uždaras; Kita
sk-SK: Štýl tkaniny rukavice: Košíkový; Uzavretý; Krížový; Dvojitý pánt; Dvojitý stĺpik; H-Web; Polmesiacový; Horizontálny pánt; I-Web; Upravený Trap; Upravený Trapeze; Jednodielny; Otvorený dvojitý stĺpik; Pro-Laced T; Jeden stĺpik; Jeden stĺpik s dvojitou lištou; T-Web; Trapeze; Dvojdielny uzavretý; Iné
en: Glove webbing style: Basket; Closed; Cross; Dual Hinge; Dual Post; H-Web; Half-Moon; Horizontal Hinge; I-Web; Modified Trap; Modified Trapeze; One-Piece; Open Dual Post; Pro-Laced T; Single Post; Single Post Double Bar; T-Web; Trapeze; Two-Piece Closed; Other
es: Estilo de correas de guante: Canasta; Cerrada; Cruzada; Doble bisagra; Doble poste; Red en H; Media luna; Bisagra horizontal; Red en I; Trampa modificada; Trapecio modificado; Una pieza; Doble poste abierto; T con cordones profesional; Poste simple; Poste simple con doble barra; Red en T; Trapecio; Cerrada de dos piezas; Otro
ru: Тип перепонки перчатки: Корзина; Закрытый; Крест; Двойной шарнир; Двойная стойка; H-образная сетка; Полумесяц; Горизонтальный шарнир; I-образная сетка; Модифицированная ловушка; Модифицированная трапеция; Цельный; Открытая двойная стойка; Профессиональная Т-образная шнуровка; Одинарная стойка; Одинарная стойка с двойной перекладиной; Т-образная сетка; Трапеция; Составной закрытый; Другое
de: Art des Fangnetzes des Handschuhs: Basket; Geschlossen; Kreuz; Dual Hinge; Dual Post; H-Web; Halbmond; Horizontal Hinge; I-Web; Modified Trap; Modified Trapeze; Einteilig; Open Dual Post; Pro-Laced T; Single Post; Single Post Double Bar; T-Web; Trapez; Zweiteilig, geschlossen; Andere
hr-HR: Stil rukavica s remenom: Košara; Zatvoreno; Križ; Dvostruki šarnir; Dvostruki stupić; H-mreža; Polumjesec; Vodoravni šarnir; I-mreža; Modificirana zamka; Modificirani trapez; Jednodijelno; Otvoreni dvostruki stupić; T s profesionalnim vezivanjem; Jednostruki stupić; Jednostruki stupić, dvostruka prečka; T-mreža; Trapez; Dvodijelno zatvoreno; Ostalo
ko: 글러브 웨빙 유형: 바스켓; 클로즈드; 크로스; 듀얼 힌지; 듀얼 포스트; H-웹; 하프문; 수평 힌지; I-웹; 모디파이드 트랩; 모디파이드 트래피즈; 원피스; 오픈 듀얼 포스트; 프로 레이스 T; 싱글 포스트; 싱글 포스트 더블 바; T-웹; 트래피즈; 투피스 클로즈드; 기타
fr: Style de toile du gant: Panier; Fermé; Croix; Double charnière; Double montant; En H; Demi-lune; Charnière horizontale; En I; Trapèze modifié; Trapèze modifié; Une pièce; Double montant ouvert; T à laçage pro; Montant simple; Montant simple double barre; En T; Trapèze; Fermé deux pièces; Autre
tr: Eldiven ağ örgüsü tipi: Sepet; Kapalı; Çapraz; Çift menteşe; Çift direk; H örgü; Yarım ay; Yatay menteşe; I örgü; Modifiye trap; Modifiye trapeze; Tek parça; Açık çift direk; Profesyonel bağcıklı T; Tek direk; Tek direk çift çubuk; T örgü; Trapeze; İki parça kapalı; Diğer
bg-BG: Стил на оплетката на ръкавицата: Кошница; Затворена; Кръст; Двойна панта; Двойна колона; H-образна мрежа; Полумесец; Хоризонтална панта; I-образна мрежа; Модифициран Trap; Модифициран Trapeze; От една част; Отворена двойна колона; Pro-Laced T; Единична колона; Единична колона с двойна лента; T-образна мрежа; Trapeze; Затворена от две части; Друго
nl: Handschoen webbingstijl: Basket; Gesloten; Kruis; Dual Hinge; Dual Post; H-Web; Halve maan; Horizontaal scharnier; I-Web; Modified Trap; Modified Trapeze; Uit één stuk; Open Dual Post; Pro-Laced T; Single Post; Single Post Double Bar; T-Web; Trapeze; Tweedelig gesloten; Anders
nb: Hanskevevstil: Kurv; Lukket; Kryss; Dobbelthengsel; Dobbel stolpe; H-web; Halvmåne; Horisontalt hengsel; I-web; Modifisert felle; Modifisert trapes; Heldekkende; Åpen dobbel stolpe; Pro-snørt T; Enkel stolpe; Enkel stolpe, dobbel stang; T-web; Trapes; Todelt, lukket; Annet
ja: グローブウェビングスタイル: バスケット; クローズド; クロス; デュアルヒンジ; デュアルポスト; Hウェブ; ハーフムーン; ホリゾンタルヒンジ; Iウェブ; モディファイドトラップ; モディファイドトラピーズ; ワンピース; オープンデュアルポスト; プロレースT; シングルポスト; シングルポストダブルバー; Tウェブ; トラピーズ; ツーピースクローズド; その他
vi: Kiểu lưới găng tay: Đan rổ; Kín; Chữ thập; Bản lề kép; Cột kép; Đan hình chữ H; Bán nguyệt; Bản lề ngang; Đan hình chữ I; Hình thang cải tiến; Hình thang cải tiến; Nguyên khối; Cột kép mở; Chữ T buộc dây chuyên nghiệp; Cột đơn; Cột đơn thanh kép; Đan hình chữ T; Hình thang; Kín hai mảnh; Khác
da: Handskens nettype: Basket; Lukket; Kryds; Dobbelt hængsel; Dual post; H-web; Halvmåne; Vandret hængsel; I-web; Modificeret trap; Modificeret trapeze; Et stykke; Åben dual post; Pro-Laced T; Enkelt post; Enkelt post dobbelt stang; T-web; Trapeze; Todelt lukket; Anden
pt-PT: estilo de teia de luva: Cesto; Fechado; Cruz; Dobradiça dupla; Poste duplo; Rede em H; Meia-lua; Dobradiça horizontal; Rede em I; Trapézio modificado; Trapézio modificado; Peça única; Poste duplo aberto; T com cordões Pro; Poste simples; Poste simples com barra dupla; Rede em T; Trapézio; Fechado de duas peças; Outro
el: Τύπος πλέγματος γαντιού: Basket; Κλειστό; Σταυρωτό; Dual Hinge; Dual Post; H-Web; Μισοφέγγαρο; Οριζόντιο Hinge; I-Web; Modified Trap; Modified Trapeze; Μονοκόμματο; Ανοιχτό Dual Post; Pro-Laced T; Single Post; Single Post Double Bar; T-Web; Trapeze; Κλειστό δύο τεμαχίων; Άλλο
cs: Styl popruhů rukavic: Basket; Uzavřený; Křížový; Dual Hinge; Dual Post; H-Web; Half-Moon; Horizontal Hinge; I-Web; Modified Trap; Modified Trapeze; Jednodílný; Open Dual Post; Pro-Laced T; Single Post; Single Post Double Bar; T-Web; Trapeze; Dvoudílný uzavřený; Ostatní
zh-CN: 手套网面款式: 篮形网; 封闭式; 十字形网; 双铰链; 双柱式; H 形网; 半月形网; 水平铰链; I 形网; 改良式陷阱网; 改良式梯形网; 一体式; 开放式双柱; 专业系带 T 形网; 单柱式; 单柱双横杆; T 形网; 梯形网; 两件式封闭网; 其他
it: Stile della rete del guanto: A cesto; Chiuso; A croce; A doppia cerniera; A doppio perno; Ad H; A mezzaluna; A cerniera orizzontale; A I; Trap modificato; A trapezio modificato; Pezzo unico; Doppio perno aperto; A T incrociata professionale; Perno singolo; Perno singolo doppia barra; A T; Trapezio; Chiuso a due pezzi; Altro
ro-RO: Model cu bandă elastică pentru mănuși: Coș (Basket); Închis; Cruce (Cross); Balamale duble (Dual Hinge); Stâlp dublu (Dual Post); Plasă în H; Semilună; Balamale orizontale; Plasă în I; Capcană modificată; Trapez modificat; Dintr-o singură bucată; Stâlp dublu deschis; T cu șireturi Pro; Stâlp simplu; Stâlp simplu cu bară dublă; Plasă în T; Trapez; Închis din două bucăți; Altele
pl: Styl siatki rękawicy: Koszykowy; Zamknięty; Krzyżowy; Z podwójnym zawiasem; Dwusłupkowy; Typu H; Półksiężycowy; Z poziomym zawiasem; Typu I; Zmodyfikowany Trap; Zmodyfikowany trapezowy; Jednoczęściowy; Otwarty dwusłupkowy; Pro-Laced T; Jednosłupkowy; Jednosłupkowy z podwójną poprzeczką; Typu T; Trapezowy; Dwuczęściowy zamknięty; Inny
th: รูปแบบตาข่ายของถุงมือ: ลายตะกร้า; แบบปิด; แบบกากบาท; บานพับคู่; เสาคู่; ลายตัว H; ลายพระจันทร์ครึ่งดวง; บานพับแนวนอน; ลายตัว I; ลายแทรปดัดแปลง; ลายทราปีซดัดแปลง; ชิ้นเดียว; เสาคู่แบบเปิด; ลายตัว T แบบโปร; เสาเดี่ยว; เสาเดี่ยวบาร์คู่; ลายตัว T; ลายทราปีซ; แบบปิดสองชิ้น; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 手套網袋樣式: 籃網型; 封閉型; 交叉型; 雙鉸鏈; 雙柱; H 型網; 半月型; 水平鉸鏈; I 型網; 改良型牛舌網; 改良型飛人網; 單片式; 開放式雙柱; 職業繫繩 T 型; 單柱; 單柱雙橫; T 型網; 飛人網; 雙片封閉型; 其他
sl-SI: Stil mrežice na rokavici: Košara; Zaprta; Križna; Dvojni tečaj; Dvojni stebriček; H-mreža; Polmesec; Vodoravni tečaj; I-mreža; Prilagojena past; Prilagojen trapez; Enodelna; Odprti dvojni stebriček; Profesionalno vezan T (Pro-Laced T); Enojni stebriček; Enojni stebriček z dvojno prečko; T-mreža; Trapez; Dvodelna, zaprta; Drugo
hu: A kesztyű háló stílusa: Kosár; Zárt; Kereszt; Dupla zsanéros; Dupla oszlopos; H-háló; Félhold; Vízszintes zsanéros; I-háló; Módosított trapéz; Módosított trapéz; Egyrészes; Nyitott dupla oszlopos; Pro-Laced T; Szimpla oszlopos; Szimpla oszlopos, dupla keresztrudas; T-háló; Trapéz; Kétrészes zárt; Egyéb